Washington statutes.
RCW 39.44.100

Facsimile signatures on bonds and coupons.

On all bonds hereafter issued by the state or any agency thereof or by any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, junior taxing district, school district or other political subdivision of the state, the printed, engraved or lithographed facsimile signatures of the officers required by law to sign the bonds or any interest coupons thereon shall be sufficient signature on such bonds or coupons: PROVIDED, That such facsimile signatures shall not be used on the bonds of issues of less than one hundred thousand dollars par value and may always be used on interest coupons.

Whenever such facsimile signature reproduction of the signature of any officer is used in place of the personal signature of such officer, the issuing authority shall specify in a written order or requisition to the printer, engraver, or lithographer, the number of bonds or coupons upon which such facsimile signature is to be printed, engraved, or lithographed, and the manner of numbering the bonds or coupons upon which such signature shall be placed. Within ninety days after the completion of the printing, engraving, or lithographing of such bonds or coupons, the plate or plates used for the purpose of affixing the facsimile signature shall be destroyed and it shall be the duty of the issuing authority, within ninety days after receipt of the completed bonds or coupons, to ascertain that such plate or plates have been destroyed.

[ 1983 c 167 s 107; 1961 c 141 s 3; 1955 c 375 s 1; 1941 c 52 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 5583-1a.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Uniform facsimile signature of public officials act: Chapter 39.62 RCW.